test/src/morphology/N-tükk41_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tükk: # Noun (41) tükk 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tükk+N+Sg+Nom: tükk
     tükk+N+Sg+Gen: tükü
     tükk+N+Sg+Par: tükkü
     tükk+N+Sg+Ill: tükkü
     tükk+N+Pl+Gen: [tükke, tükkä]
     tükk+N+Pl+Par: [tükke, tükkä]
     tükk+N+Pl+Ill: [tükkehe, tükke, tükkähe, tükkä]
     tükk+N+Pl+All: [tükele, tükäle]
